Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-510
Finding; offense of a higher grade committed than that charged; power of magistrate.

If upon the examination it shall appear to the magistrate that the accused has committed an offense of a higher grade than that charged, he may be held to answer therefor.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 309, p. 794;

R.S.1913, § 8961;

C.S.1922, § 9985;

C.S.1929, § 29-510;

R.S.1943, § 29-510.